Maryland, session 2026, HB0883.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 51 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
SUBTITLE 51. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE.
14–5101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3.5–801 §
15–10B–05.1 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT INSURANCE ARTICLE.
(C) “BEHAVIORAL HEALTH” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7.5–101 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(D) “BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7.5–101
OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(E) (1) “BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO IS LICENSED OR OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED TO PROVIDE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
CARE SERVICES UNDER THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 883 3
(2) “BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER” INCLUDES:
(I) A COUNSELOR;
(II) A PSYCHIATRIST OR OTHER LICENSED PHYSICIAN;
(III) A PSYCHOLOGIST;
(IV) A SOCIAL WORKER; AND
(V) A THERAPIST; AND
(VI) A NURSE PRACTITIONER.
(F) “DEVELOPER” MEANS A PERSON THAT OFFERS FOR SALE, SELLS,
LEASES, GIVES, OR OTHERWISE PROVIDES ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO A
CONSUMER IN THE STATE.
14–5102.
(A) A DEVELOPER MAY NOT:
(1) MAKE, OR KNOWINGLY CAUSE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO
MAKE, ANY REPRESENTATION OR STATEMENT THAT EXPLICITLY OR IMPLICITLY
INDICATES THAT THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IS:
(I) A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER; OR
(II) CAPABLE OF PROVIDING BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE; OR
(2) OFFER, SELL, LEASE, GIVE, OR OTHERWISE PROVIDE TO
CONSUMERS IN THE STATE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE THAT IS SPECIFICALLY
PROGRAMMED OR DESIGNED TO PROVIDE A SERVICE OR AN EXPERIENCE THAT
WOULD CONSTITUTE THE PRACTICE OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE IF PROVIDED BY
A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER.
(B) ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SOLD, LEASED, GIVEN, OR OTHERWISE
PROVIDED TO A CONSUMER IN THE STATE SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS NOTICE THAT THE CONSUMER IS NOT
COMMUNICATING WITH A HUMAN, DISPLAYED AT THE BEGINNING OF EACH USE; AND
(2) PROTOCOLS THAT:

HOUSE BILL 883
(I) TAKE REASONABLE STEPS TO DETECT AND ADDRESS
SUICIDAL IDEATIONS OR EXPRESSIONS OF SELF–HARM BY A CONSUMER; AND
(II) REFER THE CONSUMER TO BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES
OR THE MARYLAND BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CRISIS RESPONSE SYSTEM’S SERVICES
WHEN THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE DETECTS A CONSUMER’S SUICIDAL
IDEATIONS OR EXPRESSIONS OF SELF–HARM.
(C) A PERSON THAT VIOLATES SUBSECTION (A) OR (B) OF THIS SECTION IS
SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $1,000,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION
VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OR (B) OF THIS SECTION IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT PROVISIONS CONTAINED IN
TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(D) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY INVESTIGATE AND BRING AN ACTION
AGAINST ANY PERSON FOR AN ALLEGED VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(E) THE REVENUES FROM CIVIL PENALTIES ASSESSED FOR A VIOLATION OF
THIS SECTION SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH WORKGROUP
INVESTMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10–1502 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL
ARTICLE.
(F) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT:
(1) ANY ADVERTISEMENT, STATEMENT, OR REPRESENTATION FOR OR
RELATING TO ANY PRODUCT MEANT TO PROVIDE ADVICE AND GUIDANCE RELATING
TO BEHAVIORAL HEALTH IF THE PRODUCT DOES NOT CLAIM TO OFFER OR PROVIDE
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE; OR
(2) A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER FROM OFFERING OR
OPERATING ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE PROGRAMMED OR DESIGNED TO BE USED TO
SUPPORT ADMINISTRATIVE TASKS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.